test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-koltash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


    Verb - колташ: # Verb-em 'let go, send'
     колташ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: колтем
     колташ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: колтет
     колташ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: колта
     колташ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: колтенӓ
     колташ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: колтедӓ
     колташ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: колтат
     
     колташ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: колты
     колташ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: колтеп
#    
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: колтышым
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: колтышыц
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: колтыш
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: колтышна
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: колтышда
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: колтевӹ

     колташ+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: колты
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: колтеп
#    
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: колтенӓм
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: колтенӓт
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: колтен
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: колтеннӓ
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: колтендӓ
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: колтенӹт

##   
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: колтыделам
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: колтыделат
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: колтыде 
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: колтыделна
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: колтыделда
     колташ+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: колтыделыт
##   
     колташ+V+Imprt+Sg2: колты
     колташ+V+Imprt+Sg3: колтыжы
     колташ+V+Imprt+Pl2: колтыда
     колташ+V+Imprt+Pl3: колтышты
##   
     колташ+V+ImprtII+Sg2: колтемӓ
     колташ+V+ImprtII+Pl2: колтемӓдӓ
##   
     колташ+V+Des+Sg1: колтынем
     колташ+V+Des+Sg3: колтынет
     колташ+V+Des+Sg3: колтынежӹ
     колташ+V+Des+Pl1: колтыненӓ
     колташ+V+Des+Pl3: колтынедӓ
     колташ+V+Des+Pl3: колтынештӹ
##
     колташ+V+Inf: колташ
     колташ+V+Des+Pl3: колтынештӹ
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc: колтышы
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Nom: колтышы
     
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Gen: колтышын
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Acc: колтышым
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Com: колтышыге
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Dat: колтышылан
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Ine: колтышышты
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Ill: колтышышкы
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Lat: колтышеш
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Cmpr: колтышыла
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Abe: колтышыде
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Nom: колтышывлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Gen: колтышывлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Acc: колтышывлӓм
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Com: колтышывлӓге
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Dat: колтышывлӓлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ine: колтышывлӓштӹ
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ill: [колтышывлӓшкӹ, колтышывлӓш]
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Lat: колтышывлӓэш
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Cmpr: колтышывлӓлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Abe: колтышывлӓде

     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: колтышем 
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: колтышемӹн
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: колтышемӹм
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Com: колтышемге
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: колтышемлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: колтышыштем
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: колтышышкем
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: колтышешем
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Cmpr: колтышемлӓ 
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: колтышылаэм 
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: колтышыдеэм 
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Abe: колтышемде
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: колтышывлӓэм
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: колтышемвлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: колтышемвлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: колтышемвлӓм
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Com: колтышемвлӓге
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Com: колтышывлӓэмге
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: колтышемвлӓлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: колтышывлӓэмлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: колтышывлӓлӓнем
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: колтышывлӓштем
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: колтышемвлӓштӹ
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: колтышемвлӓшкӹ
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: колтышывлӓшкем
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: колтышемвлӓэш
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: колтышывлӓэшем
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Cmpr: колтышемвлӓлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: колтышывлӓлӓэм
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Cmpr: колтышывлӓэмлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: колтышывлӓэмде
     колташ+V+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: колтышемвлӓде

##   
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Nom: колтымы
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Gen: колтымын
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Acc: колтымым
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Com: колтымыге
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Dat: колтымылан
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Ine: колтымышты
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Ill: колтымышкы
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Lat: [колтымеш, колтымешкӹ]
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Cmpr: колтымыла
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Abe: колтымыде
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Nom: колтымывлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Gen: колтымывлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Acc: колтымывлӓм
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Com: колтымывлӓге
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Dat: колтымывлӓлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ine: колтымывлӓштӹ
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ill: [колтымывлӓшкӹ, колтымывлӓш]
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Lat: колтымывлӓэш
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Cmpr: колтымывлӓлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Abe: колтымывлӓде

     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: колтымем 
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: колтымемӹн
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: колтымемӹм
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Com: колтымемге
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: колтымемлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: колтымыштем
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: колтымышкем
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: колтымешем
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Cmpr: колтымемлӓ 
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: колтымылаэм 
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: колтымыдеэм 
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+PxSg1+Abe: колтымемде
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: колтымывлӓэм
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: колтымемвлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: колтымемвлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: колтымемвлӓм
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Com: колтымемвлӓге
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Com: колтымывлӓэмге
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: колтымемвлӓлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: колтымывлӓэмлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: колтымывлӓлӓнем
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: колтымывлӓштем
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: колтымемвлӓштӹ
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: колтымемвлӓшкӹ
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: колтымывлӓшкем
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: колтымемвлӓэш
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: колтымывлӓэшем
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Cmpr: колтымемвлӓлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: колтымывлӓлӓэм
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Cmpr: колтымывлӓэмлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: колтымывлӓэмде
     колташ+V+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: колтымемвлӓде
##
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Nom: колтыдымы
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Gen: колтыдымын
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Acc: колтыдымым
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Com: колтыдымыге
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Dat: колтыдымылан
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Ine: колтыдымышты
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Ill: колтыдымышкы
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Lat: [колтыдымеш, колтыдымешкӹ]
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Cmpr: колтыдымыла
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Abe: колтыдымыде
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Nom: колтыдымывлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Gen: колтыдымывлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Acc: колтыдымывлӓм
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Com: колтыдымывлӓге
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Dat: колтыдымывлӓлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ine: колтыдымывлӓштӹ
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ill: [колтыдымывлӓшкӹ, колтыдымывлӓш]
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Lat: колтыдымывлӓэш
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Cmpr: колтыдымывлӓлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Abe: колтыдымывлӓде

     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: колтыдымем 
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: колтыдымемӹн
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: колтыдымемӹм
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+PxSg1+Com: колтыдымемге
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: колтыдымемлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: колтыдымыштем
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: колтыдымышкем
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: колтыдымешем
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+PxSg1+Cmpr: колтыдымемлӓ 
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: колтыдымылаэм 
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: колтыдымыдеэм 
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+PxSg1+Abe: колтыдымемде
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: колтыдымывлӓэм
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: колтыдымемвлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: колтыдымемвлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: колтыдымемвлӓм
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Com: колтыдымемвлӓге
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+PxSg1+Com: колтыдымывлӓэмге
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: колтыдымемвлӓлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: колтыдымывлӓэмлӓн
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: колтыдымывлӓлӓнем
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: колтыдымывлӓштем
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: колтыдымемвлӓштӹ
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: колтыдымемвлӓшкӹ
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: колтыдымывлӓшкем
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: колтыдымемвлӓэш
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: колтыдымывлӓэшем
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Cmpr: колтыдымемвлӓлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: колтыдымывлӓлӓэм
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+PxSg1+Cmpr: колтыдымывлӓэмлӓ
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: колтыдымывлӓэмде
     колташ+V+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: колтыдымемвлӓде
